Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4504
Law enforcement officer; failure to comply with electronic recordation requirement; jury instruction.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 29-4505 to 29-4507, if a law enforcement officer fails to comply with section 29-4503, a court shall instruct the jury that they may draw an adverse inference for the law enforcement officer's failure to comply with such section.

Laws 2008, LB179, § 4.